src/morphology/stems/closed-classes.lexc
LEXICON Subjunction
koska subj ;

LEXICON subj
 +CS: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
eli conjunctiontag ;
ja conjunctiontag ;
tai conjunctiontag ;
vai conjunctiontag ;


LEXICON conjunctiontag
 +CC: # ;

LEXICON Interjection
hyi ij ;

LEXICON ij
 +Interj: # ;

!LEXICON Pronoun
! # ;

!LEXICON Numeral 
! # ;

!LEXICON Punctuation
! # ;
